xal.dict
белдәч/5,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
далваг/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
далврң/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
иг/29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297
корсум/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
космодром/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
ратификац/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
рационализатор/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
уг/29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297
үг/29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297
фольклорч/5,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
фракц/2,3,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,85,86,87,88,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279
ЦК/29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297
